Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2426
Applications; contents.

Each application for a National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit or construction and operating permit shall include, in addition to other requirements, (1) a certification that the information contained in the application is accurate to the best of the applicant's knowledge and belief and that the applicant has the authority under the laws of the State of Nebraska to sign the application and (2) a completed nutrient management plan and supporting documentation unless such information has been previously submitted and is unchanged. The nutrient management plan shall be considered a part of the application. For National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permits, the plan shall, at a minimum, meet and conform to the requirements of the National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System in the federal Clean Water Act, 33 U.S.C. 1251 et seq. A copy of the nutrient management plan and supporting documentation shall continuously be kept on file at the department. The operator shall at least annually update changes made to the nutrient management plan as required pursuant to rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the council. For a construction and operating permit, the plan shall contain, at a minimum, the information which the department required to be included in all nutrient management plans on January 1, 2004.

Laws 2004, LB 916, § 15;

Laws 2006, LB 975, § 9.